Massachusetts, session 194th, H3684.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 9 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “certificate” the last time it appears, the following
words:-
Any temporary non-reducible load, such a dumpsters, shipping containers and pods, that
are left in vehicular traffic areas, private or municipal lots or roadways, shall have reflective tape
adhered to the unit as defined in the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration’s CFR 393.11.
of 1